Washington statutes.
RCW 18.205.160

Co-occurring disorder specialist enhancement—Substance use disorder counseling services.

The department of health must amend its rules, including WAC 246-341-0515, to allow persons with a co-occurring disorder specialist enhancement under chapter 18.205 RCW to provide substance use disorder counseling services that are equal in scope with the scope and practice of a substance use disorder professional under chapter 18.205 RCW, subject to the practice limitations under RCW 18.205.105.

[ 2019 c 444 s 29.]